test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VII_N_IND_minogin_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VII - N - mnogin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	obv     mod     per
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 257)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mnogin+VII+0: mnogin
     mnogin+VII+0+4: mnognini

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mnogin+VII+0+Prt: mnognaba
     mnogin+VII+0+4+Prt: mnogninwiba
     mnogin+VII+0+Dub: mnognadig
     mnogin+VII+0+4+Dub: mnogninwidig
     mnogin+VII+0+Prt+Dub: mnognogba
     mnogin+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnogningoba

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     mnogin+VII+0+Prt+0+Pl: mnognabniin
     mnogin+VII+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mnogninwibniin
     mnogin+VII+0+Dub+0+Pl: mnognadgenan
     mnogin+VII+0+4+Dub+0+Pl: mnogninwidgenan
     mnogin+VII+0+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnognogbaniin
     mnogin+VII+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnogningobniin

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mnogin+VII+0+0+Pl: mnognoon
     mnogin+VII+0+4+0+Pl: mnogninwan

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0: mnognzinoo
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4: mnognzinooni

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+Prt: mnognzinooba
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt: mnognzinoonwiba
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+Dub: mnognzinoodig
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+Dub: mnognzinoonwidig
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub: mnognzinoogba
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnognzinoongoba

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: mnognzinoobniin
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+0+Pl: mnognzinoonwibniin
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: mnognzinoodgenan
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+Dub+0+Pl: mnognzinoonwidgenan
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnognzinoogbaniin
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub+0+Pl: mnognzinoongobniin

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+0+Pl: mnognzinoon
     mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+0+Pl: mnognzinninwan
     #mnogin+VII+Neg+0+4+0+Pl: mnognzinwan #!variant listed in book
